Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.257

Assessments—Payment, lien, delinquencies, foreclosure, etc.

The provisions of chapters 84.56 and 84.64 RCW and RCW 36.29.180 governing liens, collection, payment of assessments, delinquent assessments, interest and penalties, lien foreclosure and foreclosed property shall govern such matters as applied to mosquito control districts.

[ 2020 c 54 s 1; 1959 c 64 s 9.]